Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 23, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 8, chapter 757,
Oregon Laws 2005, section 11, chapter 780,  Oregon Laws 2007, section 19, chapter 608, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 2, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  [ Sections 15 to 22, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, ] ORS 409.800 to 409.816 and 409.900
apply to  long term care facility assessments imposed in calendar quarters beginning on or after
November 26, 2003, and before [ July 1, 2026 ] June 30, 2032 .
SECTION 2.  Section 31, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 9, chapter 757,
Oregon Laws 2005, section 14, chapter 780, Oregon  Laws 2007, section 49, chapter 11, Oregon Laws
2009, section 21, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 3, chapter 66, Oregon  Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
Sec. 31.  [ Sections 15 to 22, 24 and  29, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, ] ORS 409.800 to 409.816
and 409.900 are repealed on January 2, [ 2028] 2034.
Enrolled House Bill 4033 (HB 4033-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4033 (HB 4033-INTRO) Page 2